Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB810.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3(g) of the act of June 30, 2011 (P.L.81, No.18), known as the Pennsylvania Web Accountability and Transparency (PennWATCH) Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 3. Searchable budget database.* * *(f.1) Settlements.--(1) The website shall include information on each settlement paid to an employee of a Commonwealth agency or paid to an individual as a result of an action taken by an employee of a Commonwealth agency for each claim under the 12345678910111213141516171819 Employee Liability Self-Insurance Program, the Automobile Liability Self-Insurance Program, the Motor License Tort Claim Fund, notary bonds and the General Tort Claims Self-Insurance Fund. The information shall include all of the following:(i) The Commonwealth agency that is the subject of the claim.(ii) The date when the claim was filed.(iii) The legal basis for the settlement.(iv) The date when the settlement was paid.(v) The amount of the settlement.(2) No later than 30 days after the date when a settlement is paid, the office shall post the information under paragraph (1) on the website.(3) No later than 30 days after the effective date of this paragraph and every 30 days thereafter, the Department of General Services shall electronically transmit the information under paragraph (1) regarding each settlement paid in the previous 30 days to all the members of the General Assembly.(4) No later than 30 days after the effective date of this paragraph, the Department of General Services shall electronically transmit the information under paragraph (1) regarding each settlement paid in the period beginning January 1, 2025, and ending on the effective date of this paragraph to all the members of the General Assembly.(g) Exemption.--Notwithstanding subsections (a), (b) [and], (f) and (f.1), the following shall not be included on the website:(1) Records, data or other information exempted from 20250HB0810PN0840 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disclosure under 24 Pa.C.S. § 8502(e)(2) (relating to administrative duties of board).(2) Records, data or other information exempted from disclosure under 71 Pa.C.S. § 5902(e)(2) (relating to administrative duties of the board).(3) Records not subject to disclosure under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.* * *Section 2. Section 4(a) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 4. Administration.(a) Commonwealth agency requirements.--Each Commonwealth agency shall cooperate with the Governor's Office of Administration. The following shall apply:* * *(3) Each Commonwealth agency shall provide the office with information on each settlement paid for each claim settled as required under section 3(f.1):(i) Within five business days of the date of the settlement.(ii) Before the office posts the information on the website.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0810PN0840 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425